Washington statutes.
RCW 36.110.060

Board of directors—Duties.

The board, in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, shall:

(1) Establish an arbitration process for resolving conflicts arising among the local business community and labor organizations concerning new industries programs, products, services, or wages;

(2) Encourage the development of the collection and analysis of jail industries program data, including long-term tracking information on offender recidivism;

(3) Determine, by applying established federal guidelines and criteria, whether a city or a county jail free venture industries program complies with the private sector prison industry enhancement certification program. In so doing, also determine if that industry should be designated as a cost accounting center for the purposes of the federal certification program; and

(4) Provide technical assistance with product marketing.

[ 1993 c 285 s 6.]